zh-TW: 繩索材質: 棉; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 聚丙烯 (PP); 其他
es: Material de la cuerda: Algodón; Nailon; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Otro
pt-PT: Material da corda: Algodão; Nylon; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Outro
fr: Matière de la corde: Coton; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylène (PP); Autre
zh-CN: 绳索材质: 棉; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 聚丙烯 (PP); 其他
ro-RO: Materialul frânghiei: Bumbac; Nailon; Poliester; Polipropilenă (PP); Altele
tr: Halat malzemesi: Pamuk; Naylon; Polyester; Polipropilen (PP); Diğer
it: Materiale della corda: Cotone; Nylon; Poliestere; Polipropilene (PP); Altro
bg-BG: Материал на въжето: Памук; Найлон; Полиестер; Полипропилен (PP); Друго
nl: Touw materiaal: Katoen; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropyleen (PP); Overige
pt-BR: Corda material: Algodão; Nylon; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Outro
en: Rope material: Cotton; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Other
el: Υλικό σχοινιού: Βαμβάκι; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Άλλο
sl-SI: Material vrvi: Bombaž; Najlon; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Drugo
fi: Köyden materiaali: Puuvilla; Nailon; Polyesteri; Polypropeeni (PP); Muu
sv: Repmaterial: Bomull; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropen (PP); Övrigt
cs: Materiál lana: Bavlna; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Jiné
ja: ロープ素材: コットン; ナイロン; ポリエステル; ポリプロピレン (PP); その他
da: Rebmateriale: Bomuld; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Andet
hu: Kötél anyaga: Pamut; Nejlon; Poliészter; Polipropilén (PP); Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal užeta: Pamuk; Najlon; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Ostalo
de: Seilmaterial: Baumwolle; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Sonstige
ko: 로프 소재: 면; 나일론; 폴리에스터; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 기타
ru: Материал веревки: Хлопок; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Полипропилен (ПП); Другое
lt-LT: Virvės medžiaga: Medvilnė; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Polipropilenas (PP); Kita
pl: Materiał linki: Bawełna; Nylon; Poliester; Polipropylen (PP); Inny
sk-SK: Materiál lana: Bavlna; Nylón; Polyester; Polypropylén (PP); Iné
th: วัสดุเชือก: ฝ้าย; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); อื่นๆ
vi: Vật liệu dây thừng: Cotton; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Khác
nb: Taumateriale: Bomull; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Annet